spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX M   0    ök           [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödül         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödön         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéül        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéért       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödévé        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödével       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödétől       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödét         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéről       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödért        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödére        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödénél       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödének       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödén         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékül       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékön       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékéül      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékéért     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékévé      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékével     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékétől     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékét       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékéről     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékért      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékére      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékénél     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékének     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékén       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékéig      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékéhöz     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékéből     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékében     [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékébe      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéké        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéktől      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékről      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékre       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéknél      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéknek      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékké       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékkel      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékig       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékhöz      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéket       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékből      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékben      [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödékbe       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödék         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéig        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéhöz       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödéből       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödében       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödébe        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödé          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödtől        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödről        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödre         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödnél        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödnek        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödként       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödkor        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödig         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödhöz        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödet         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    öddé         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    öddel        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödből        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödben        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ödbe         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    öd           [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékül         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékön         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékéül        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékéért       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékévé        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékével       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékétől       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékét         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékéről       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékért        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékére        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékénél       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékének       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékén         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékéig        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékéhöz       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékéből       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékében       [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékébe        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    éké          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    éktől        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékről        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékre         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    éknél        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    éknek        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékké         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékkel        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékig         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékhöz        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    éket         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékből        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékben        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    ékbe         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    t            [ilnruxzáéíóőöúűü]
SFX M   0    t            [aeiuáéíóőöúűü]j
SFX M   0    t            [aeiouáéíóőöúűü]zs
SFX M   0    t            [aeiouáéíóőöúűü][^g]y
SFX M   0    t            [^cz]s
