spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.dic
üvöltethető/CDHWRMX
ütemeztető/CDHWRMXY
üresfejű/CDHWRM
ülepedő/CDHWRMXY
ügyeskedtethető/CDHWRMX
üdvözlő/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
özvegyülő/CDHWRMXY
ösztönös/CWMmTYcDBDGVNMT
összegöngyölgető/CDHWRMXY
örökölhető/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMX
öregbülő/CDHWRMXY
öntözgettető/CDHWRMXY
önbecsülő/CDHWRM
öltöny/CWMmTYcD
öldöshető/CDHWRMX
öklelhető/CDHWRMX
őszítendő/CDHWRMX
őrizhető/CDHWRMX
ízetlenkedő/CDHWRMXY
ígérhető/CDHWRMX
észrevevődtethető/CDHWRMX
érzéstelenítendő/CDHWRMX
érvényesülő/CDHWRMXY
érthető/CDHWRMX
értekeződendő/CDHWRMX
éreztettethető/CDHWRMX
érdemelendő/CDHWRMX
énekeltető/CDHWRMXY
élvező/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
élethű/CDHWRM
éldegélő/CDHWRMXY
ékesíttethető/CDHWRMX
édesítő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
átíveltető/CDHWRMXY
átmérő/CWMRmYcD
árverezhető/CDHWRMX
Üskö/CWMR
Őmező/CWMR
zötyögtettető/CDHWRMXY
zörgetendő/CDHWRMX
zöldelltethető/CDHWRMX
zsúptető/CWMRymYcD
zsigerelhető/CDHWRMX
zenésíttethető/CDHWRMX
völgyelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
vízkieresztő/CWMRymYcD
véső/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
vérezendő/CDHWRMX
véleményezendő/CDHWRMX
végigböngésző/CDHWRMXY
védekezhető/CDHWRMX
vizesítő/CDHWRMXY
viszontszerethető/CDHWRMX
villásreggelizendő/CDHWRMX
vezető/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXYCDHWRM
vetélkedő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
vesződő/CDHWRMXY
veszejtő/CDHWRMXY
versengetendő/CDHWRMX
verejtékeztető/CDHWRMXY
vehető/CDHWRMX
vastagbőrű/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
utánvételezendő/CDHWRMX
tüsténkedő/CDHWRMXY
tülköltető/CDHWRMXY
tűzendő/CDHWRMX
túlmenő/CDHWRM
törölközendő/CDHWRMX
törvénykező/CDHWRMXY
törköly/CWMmTYcD
töppeszthető/CDHWRMX
tömöríthető/CDHWRMX
tömendő/CDHWRMX
tökéletesítő/CDHWRMXY
többférjű/CDHWRM
tévesztető/CDHWRMXY
térfogatmérő/CWMRymYcD
tépelődő/CDHWRMXY
tánccipő/CWMRymYcD
trébelhető/CDHWRMX
tisztesfű/CWYcCWMRmYcD
tetőztethető/CDHWRMX
tetszelegő/CDHWRMXY
tessékelhető/CDHWRMX
terpesztethető/CDHWRMX
termesztendő/CDHWRMX
terhelődhető/CDHWRMX
teregető/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
tentikéltető/CDHWRMXY
teljesülő/CDHWRMXY
telekkönyvezhető/CDHWRMX
tekergőző/CDHWRMXY
tehermentesítő/CDHWRMXY
sütögetendő/CDHWRMX
süppesztető/CDHWRMXY
süketültethető/CDHWRMX
sötétülő/CDHWRMXY
söprögető/CDHWRMXY
sértendő/CDHWRMCDHMWR
szüremlő/CDHWRMXY
szülemlő/CDHWRMXY
szűkítendő/CDHWRMX
szöszölendő/CDHWRMX
szökő/CDHWRMXY
szőrözendő/CDHWRMX
szívleltető/CDHWRMXY
színesíttethető/CDHWRMX
szélfű/CWYcCWMRmYcD
székeltető/CDHWRMXY
szédelegtethető/CDHWRMX
szájhősködő/CDHWRMXY
szikraköz/CWMymTYcD
szervizeltető/CDHWRMXY
szeretgető/CDHWRMXY
szerelhető/CDHWRMX
szentségelő/CDHWRMXY
szenesíthető/CDHWRMX
szemrevételező/CDHWRMXY
szemerkélő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
szelídíttető/CDHWRMXY
szelethető/CDHWRMX
szegő/CDHWRMXY
szegelhető/CDHWRMX
szavahihető/CDHWRM
strapacipő/CWMRymYcD
spuriző/CDHWRMXY
sokrészű/CDHWRM
skubiző/CDHWRMXY
sikeríttethető/CDHWRMX
serkedeztető/CDHWRMXY
sepertető/CDHWRMXY
semlegesítendő/CDHWRMX
segítő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
sebeztethető/CDHWRMX
rücskös/BDGVNMT
röpíttető/CDHWRMXY
röhécselendő/CDHWRMX
rézsű/CWMRmYcD
részesítő/CDHWRMXY
rémüldöző/CDHWRMXY
ráreppenő/CDHWRMXY
rossznyelvű/CDHWRM
rezzegettető/CDHWRMXY
rezdíttethető/CDHWRMX
reteszelhető/CDHWRMX
repíttető/CDHWRMXY
rendű/CDHWRM
rendelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
rekesztethető/CDHWRMX
rejtegettethető/CDHWRMX
recéztető/CDHWRMXY
rajtaüthető/CDHWRMX
pöszíthető/CDHWRMX
pörgő/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
pöfékeltethető/CDHWRMX
pólóütő/CWMRymYcD
pukizendő/CDHWRMX
pozőr/BDGVNMR
piszeghető/CDHWRMX
pingeltető/CDHWRMXY
pihenendő/CDHWRMX
pettyező/CDHWRMXY
pergettető/CDHWRMXY
perdíthető/CDHWRMX
penderíthető/CDHWRMX
pedertető/CDHWRMXY
palafedő/CWMRymYcD
okszerűsítő/CDHWRMXY
növelendő/CDHWRMX
nótáskönyv/CWMmTYcD
népesülő/CDHWRMXY
négykerekű/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
nyűvődhető/CDHWRMX
nyomásmérő/CWMRymYcD
nyerekedő/CDHWRMXY
nyalizhető/CDHWRMX
nevetgéltető/CDHWRMXY
nemzendő/CDHWRMX
nehezteltető/CDHWRMXY
nedvességmérő/CWMRymYcD
nagylendületű/CWMRmYcD
műveltető/CDHWRMXY
mézező/CDHWRMXY
mérlegelő/CDHWRMXY
mérető/CDHWRMXY
mélyíttető/CDHWRMXY
mályvaszínű/CDHWRM
minősíttető/CDHWRMXY
mesélendő/CDHWRMX
merészeltető/CDHWRMXY
meregettethető/CDHWRMX
mentegető/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
menekíthető/CDHWRMX
mellesedő/CDHWRMXY
megérhető/CDHWRM
megsértődött/BDGVNMR
megpapizendő/CDHWRMX
megkettyinthető/CDHWRMX
meggyökeredztethető/CDHWRMX
megdicsőülhető/CDHWRMX
mailező/CDHWRMXY
lövöldöző/CDHWRMXY
löttyentethető/CDHWRMX
lóversenyeztető/CDHWRMXY
lépkedő/CDHWRMXY
lélegeztethető/CDHWRMX
légfürdőzhető/CDHWRMX
lokniztethető/CDHWRMX
lifteztető/CDHWRMXY
levéltetű/CWMRymYcD
levedztető/CDHWRMXY
leppegő/CDHWRMXY
lengő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
lelkiző/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
leletezendő/CDHWRMX
legöröghető/CDHWRMX
legelülső/CDHWRM
lefetyelendő/CDHWRMX
lebzseltető/CDHWRMXY
küszöbölő/CDHWRMXY
különböztettethető/CDHWRMX
közösíttető/CDHWRMXY
közvetítő/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
köz/CWMmTYcD
követhető/CDHWRMX
kötöztethető/CDHWRMX
kötekedő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
köröztethető/CDHWRMX
körbeégő/CDHWRMY
köpesztetendő/CDHWRMX
könyvelendő/CDHWRMX
költöztettető/CDHWRMXY
köhögtethető/CDHWRMX
kótyavetyélő/CDHWRMXY
kímélő/CDHWRMXY
kétértelmű/CDHWRM
kételkedő/CDHWRMXY
késztettethető/CDHWRMX
kérődző/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kérelmezhető/CDHWRMX
kérdendő/CDHWRMX
képesíttethető/CDHWRMX
kénytelenedendő/CDHWRMX
kémleltető/CDHWRMXY
kégliztethető/CDHWRMX
kábszerezendő/CDHWRMX
krakélereskedtethető/CDHWRMX
konfidenskedő/CDHWRMXY
kiélhető/CDHWRM
kitűrődő/CDHWRMXY
kiserdő/CWMRmYcD
kipörsentető/CDHWRMXY
kikötött/BDGVNMR
kifizetődtethető/CDHWRMX
kicsinyíttethető/CDHWRMX
kiböngésző/CDHWRMXY
kezdő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
keverhető/CDHWRMX
keskenyíttethető/CDHWRMX
kerülgettethető/CDHWRMX
keringethető/CDHWRMX
keresztelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kerekíttető/CDHWRMXY
kendőzendő/CDHWRMX
kempingezhető/CDHWRMX
kellemkedtető/CDHWRMXY
kegyelmeztető/CDHWRMXY
kedvelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
jövesztendő/CDHWRMX
jésültető/CDHWRMXY
jelölő/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
jegyző/CDHMWXRY
ismerős/CWMmTYcD
ingereltető/CDHWRMXY
ihletendő/CDHWRMX
idegesíttető/CDHWRMXY
hörögő/CDHWRMXY
hőbörögő/CDHWRMXY
hátultöltő/CWMRmYcD
hisztiztethető/CDHWRMX
hessentető/CDHWRMXY
hemzsegtethető/CDHWRMX
hegyeztető/CDHWRMXY
haszonbérelendő/CDHWRMX
hagyományőrző/CWMRmYcD
görcsös/BDGVNMT
göcsörtös/BDGVNMT
gyüszmékelő/CDHWRMXY
gyűjtögethető/CDHWRMX
gyökeredzhető/CDHWRMX
gyepesedő/CDHWRMXY
gereblyéztethető/CDHWRMX
füstöltethető/CDHWRMX
függetlenítő/CDHWRMXY
fölérő/CDHWRMY
főzendő/CDHWRMX
fényesítendő/CDHWRMX
fékeztethető/CDHWRMX
firniszező/CDHWRMXY
feszélyezendő/CDHWRMX
fenyőerdő/CWMRymYcD
felsérthető/CDHWRMCDHMWR
felfüggesztődtető/CDHWRMXY
feledtető/CDHWRMXY
fejlesztő/CDHWRMXY
fedeztettethető/CDHWRMX
ezermesterkedtető/CDHWRMXY
estethető/CDHWRMX
erődíthető/CDHWRMX
eredeztettethető/CDHWRMX
engedélyeztethető/CDHWRMX
emelgettető/CDHWRMXY
eléterjeszthető/CDHWRMX
elsöprő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRM
elnincstelenedő/CDHWRMXY
elkélhető/CDHWRMX
elerkölcstelenedendő/CDHWRMX
ehető/CDHWRMXCDHWRM
egyetemesíttető/CDHWRMXY
edzendő/CDHWRMX
dűtő/CDHWRMXY
döngölendő/CDHWRMX
döcögtethető/CDHWRMX
dumcsiztető/CDHWRMXY
derítő/CDHWRMXY
céllövő/CWMRymYcD
csörtetendő/CDHWRMX
csömöszölő/CDHWRMXY
csévélhető/CDHWRMX
csipdestethető/CDHWRMX
cserző/CDHMWXRY
csepegtető/CDHWRMXY
cseleztető/CDHWRMXY
cikizendő/CDHWRMX
büntető/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
böngésztethető/CDHWRMX
bőröző/CDHWRMXY
béleltethető/CDHWRMX
borseprő/CWMRmYcD
biggyesztető/CDHWRMXY
beszemétkedtető/CDHWRMXY
belezhető/CDHWRMX
befőtt/CWMmRYcD
becserkészendő/CDHWRMX
aprócseprő/CDHWRM
aggófű/CWYcCWMRmYcD
Töttös/CWMT
Szűgy/CWMT
Révfülöp/CWMR
Nemeskűrt/CWMR
Magyarbükkös/CWMT
Kisürögd/CWMR
Jókő/CWMR
Hagyárosbörönd/CWMR
Garamlök/CWMR
Erőmű/CWMR
Csög/CWMT
Bős/CWMT
Balatonmáriafürdő/CWMR
